Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 2 Noncompliance with Article

11-9-625.
Remedies for secured party’s failure to comply with article.

Judicial orders concerning noncompliance.If it is established that a secured party is not proceeding in accordance with this article, a court may order or restrain collection, enforcement, or disposition of collateral on appropriate terms and conditions.

Damages for noncompliance.Subject to subsections (c), (d), and (f) of this Code section, a person is liable for damages in the amount of any loss caused by a failure to comply with this article. Loss caused by a failure to comply may include loss resulting from the debtor’s inability to obtain, or increased costs of, alternative financing.

Persons entitled to recover damages; statutory damages if collateral is consumer goods.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-628:

A person that, at the time of the failure, was a debtor, was an obligor, or held a security interest in or other lien on the collateral may recover damages under subsection (b) of this Code section for its loss; and

If the collateral is consumer goods, a person that was a debtor or a secondary obligor at the time a secured party failed to comply with this part may recover for that failure in any event an amount not less than the credit service charge plus 10 percent of the principal amount of the obligation or the time price differential plus 10 percent of the cash price.

Recovery when deficiency eliminated or reduced.A debtor whose deficiency is eliminated under Code Section 11-9-626 may recover damages for the loss of any surplus. However, a debtor or secondary obligor whose deficiency is eliminated or reduced under Code Section 11-9-626 may not otherwise recover under subsection (b) of this Code section for noncompliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance.

Statutory damages; noncompliance with specified provisions.In addition to any damages recoverable under subsection (b) of this Code section, the debtor, consumer obligor, or person named as a debtor in a filed record, as applicable, may recover $250.00 in each case from a person that:

Fails to comply with Code Section 11-9-208;

Fails to comply with Code Section 11-9-209;

Files a record that the person is not entitled to file under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-509;

Fails to cause the secured party of record to file or send a termination statement as required by subsection (a) or (c) of Code Section 11-9-513;

Fails to comply with paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-616 and whose failure is part of a pattern, or consistent with a practice, of noncompliance; or

Fails to comply with paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-616.

Statutory damages; noncompliance with Code Section 11-9-210.A debtor or consumer obligor may recover damages under subsection (b) of this Code section and, in addition, $250.00 in each case from a person that, without reasonable cause, fails to comply with a request under Code Section 11-9-210. A recipient of a request under Code Section 11-9-210 which never claimed an interest in the collateral or obligations that are the subject of a request under that Code section has a reasonable excuse for failure to comply with the request within the meaning of this subsection.

Limitation of security interest; noncompliance with Code Section 11-9-210.If a secured party fails to comply with a request regarding a list of collateral or a statement of account under Code Section 11-9-210, the secured party may claim a security interest only as shown in the list or statement included in the request as against a person that is reasonably misled by the failure.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-625, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 18/SB 185.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “if collateral is consumer goods” for “in consumer goods transaction” in the heading of subsection (c).

11-9-626.
Action in which deficiency or surplus is in issue.

Applicable rules if amount of deficiency or surplus in issue.In an action arising from a transaction, other than a consumer transaction, in which the amount of a deficiency or surplus is in issue, the following rules apply:

A secured party need not prove compliance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance unless the debtor or a secondary obligor places the secured party’s compliance in issue;

If the secured party’s compliance is placed in issue, the secured party has the burden of establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with this part;

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-628, if a secured party fails to prove that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was conducted in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance, the liability of a debtor or a secondary obligor for a deficiency is limited to an amount by which the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees exceeds the greater of:

The proceeds of the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance; or

The amount of proceeds that would have been realized had the noncomplying secured party proceeded in accordance with the provisions of this part relating to collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance;

For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of this subsection, the amount of proceeds that would have been realized is equal to the sum of the secured obligation, expenses, and attorney’s fees unless the secured party proves that the amount is less than that sum;

If a deficiency or surplus is calculated under subsection (f) of Code Section 11-9-615, the debtor or obligor has the burden of establishing that the amount of proceeds of the disposition is significantly below the range of prices that a complying disposition to a person other than the secured party, a person related to the secured party, or a secondary obligor would have brought.

Nonconsumer transactions; no inference.The limitation of the rules in subsection (a) of this Code section to transactions other than consumer transactions is intended to leave to the court the determination of the proper rules in consumer transactions. The court may not infer from that limitation the nature of the proper rule in consumer transactions and may continue to apply established approaches.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-626, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-627.
Determination of whether conduct was commercially reasonable.

Greater amount obtainable under other circumstances; no preclusion of commercial reasonableness.The fact that a greater amount could have been obtained by a collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance at a different time or in a different method from that selected by the secured party is not of itself sufficient to preclude the secured party from establishing that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance was made in a commercially reasonable manner.

Dispositions that are commercially reasonable.A disposition of collateral is made in a commercially reasonable manner if the disposition is made:

In the usual manner on any recognized market;

At the price current in any recognized market at the time of the disposition; or

Otherwise in conformity with reasonable commercial practices among dealers in the type of property that was the subject of the disposition.

Approval by court or on behalf of creditors.A collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is commercially reasonable if it has been approved:

In a judicial proceeding;

By a bona fide creditors’ committee;

By a representative of creditors; or

By an assignee for the benefit of creditors.

Approval under subsection (c) of this Code section not necessary; absence of approval has no effect.Approval under subsection (c) of this Code section need not be obtained, and lack of approval does not mean that the collection, enforcement, disposition, or acceptance is not commercially reasonable.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-627, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-628.
Nonliability and limitation on liability of secured party; liability of secondary obligor.

Limitation of liability of secured party for noncompliance with article.Unless a secured party knows that a person is a debtor or obligor, knows the identity of the person, and knows how to communicate with the person:

The secured party is not liable to the person, or to a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against the person, for failure to comply with this article; and

The secured party’s failure to comply with this article does not affect the liability of the person for a deficiency.

Limitation of liability based on status as secured party.A secured party is not liable because of its status as secured party:

To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor or obligor;

The identity of the person; and

How to communicate with the person; or

To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

That the person is a debtor; and

The identity of the person.

Limitation of liability if reasonable belief that transaction not a consumer goods transaction or consumer transaction.A secured party is not liable to any person, and a person’s liability for a deficiency is not affected, because of any act or omission arising out of the secured party’s reasonable belief that a transaction is not a consumer goods transaction or a consumer transaction or that goods are not consumer goods, if the secured party’s belief is based on its reasonable reliance on:

A debtor’s representation concerning the purpose for which collateral was to be used, acquired, or held; or

An obligor’s representation concerning the purpose for which a secured obligation was incurred.

Limitation of liability for statutory damages.A secured party is not liable to any person under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-625 for its failure to comply with Code Section 11-9-616.

Limitation of multiple liability for statutory damages.A secured party is not liable under paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-625 more than once with respect to any one secured obligation.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-628, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.